Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 18
YOUTH REHABILITATION ACT

Sec.

§ 16-1801. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1802. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1803. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1804. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1805. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1806. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1806A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1807. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1807A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1808. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1809. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1809A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1810. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1811. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1812. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1812A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1813. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1814. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1814A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1814B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1814C. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1815. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1816. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1816A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1817. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1818. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1819. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1820. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1821. Youth rehabilitation duties of board. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1822. Examination of committed person. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1823. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1824. Written records. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1825. Failure to reexamine

Effect of. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1826. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1827. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1828. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1829. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1830. Revocation of conditional release — Order of department to retake escapee or conditional release violator

Prerevocation hearing procedure. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1831. Conditional release document to specify conditions of conditional release — Signature by youth offender

After care services. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1832. Discharge. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1833. Community based correction programs — Establishment — Standards

Placement of youth offenders. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1834. Case management staff required

Duties. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1835. Diagnostic and observation programs. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1836. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1837. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1838. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1839. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1840. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1841. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1842. Order for payment of costs. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1843. Effect of discharge by department. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1844. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1845. Appeal not to stay commitment, exception. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1846. Penalty clause. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1847. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1848. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1849. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1850. Citation of act. [Repealed.]